Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB68.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 100.401 TO 100.419 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
If a land use development plan or subdivision plan is for a proposed development
adjacent to the boundary of a county that is not part of the planning unit and the
development would likely have a substantial impact on the transportation or other
infrastructure located in the adjacent county, then the planning unit shall require as a
binding element of any application for the plan a memorandum of understanding or
other similar agreement approving the plan between the applicant and the adjacent
county that is not part of the planning unit.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 11/6/2025 9:46 AM Jacketed